Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 2

Tennessee General Assembly Uniform Nepotism Policy Act of 2006

3-1-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee General Assembly Uniform Nepotism Policy Act of 2006.”

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 47.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-1-202. Part definition.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “relative” means a parent, foster parent, parent-in-law, child, spouse, brother, foster brother, sister, foster sister, grandparent, grandchild, son-in-law, brother-in-law, daughter-in-law, sister-in-law, or other family member who resides in the same household.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 47.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-1-203. Direct supervision of relatives prohibited.

Within the general assembly, no employees who are relatives shall be placed within the same direct line of supervision whereby one (1) relative is responsible for supervising the job performance or work activities of another relative; provided, that, to the extent possible, this part shall not be construed to prohibit two (2) or more relatives from working within the general assembly.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 47.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-1-204. Transfer of spouses.

When as a result of a marriage, general assembly employees are in violation of the prohibition established by this part, the violation shall be resolved by means of a transfer within the general assembly, transfer to another governmental entity, or resignation as may be necessary to remove the violation. The director of legislative administration shall advise the employees of each of the alternatives available to remove the violation. The employees shall be given the opportunity to select among the available alternatives. If the employees are unable to agree upon any the alternative within sixty (60) days, then the speaker of the house of representatives, the speaker of the senate, both speakers acting jointly or the joint legislative services committee shall take appropriate action to resolve the violation.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 47.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-1-205. Prospective application of part.

The prohibition established by this part shall not be applied retroactively, but shall be adhered to by the general assembly in all hiring and employee transactions subsequent to February 15, 2006.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 47.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”